Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6115.05
Anti-takeover provision; violation; cease and desist order.

Whenever it appears to the director that any person or any director, officer, employee, or agent of the person has engaged in any conduct in violation of section 44-6115, the director may order the person to cease and desist immediately any further activity. After notice and hearing, the director may also order the person to void any contracts and restore the status quo if such action is in the best interest of the policyholders, the creditors, or the public.

Laws 1997, LB 52, § 13.